Massachusetts, session 194th, H5445.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 46 of the acts of 2020 or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the licensing authority of the city of Easthampton may grant up to 8
additional licenses for the sale of all alcoholic beverages originally authorized pursuant to said
chapter 46.
SECTION 2. Licenses granted pursuant to this act shall be issued by the licensing
authority of the city of Easthampton pursuant to section 12 or section 15 of chapter 138 of the
General Laws and shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 except section 17.
SECTION 3. The licensing authority of the city of Easthampton shall not approve the
transfer of a license granted pursuant to this act to any other location outside of the city of
Easthampton, but it may grant a license to a new applicant at the same location if the applicant
files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue and a letter from the
of 2

department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in good standing with those
departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have been paid.
SECTION 4. A license granted pursuant to this act shall be returned physically, with all
of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority of the
city of Easthampton if the licensee terminates or fails to renew the license or if the license is
cancelled, revoked or no longer in use at the location of original issuance and the licensing
authority may then grant the license to a new applicant at the same location under the same
conditions as specified in this act.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2